Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
FOSTER CHILDREN
SECTION 1. The court, on its own motion or upon the motion of a party in the pro-
ceeding, and after any hearing as the court may direct, may enter an order limiting, denying
or prohibiting contact between  a foster child and the foster child’s sibling to the extent
necessary to ensure safe and appropriate contact between the foster child and the foster
child’s sibling. If the court issues an order  under this section, the court shall make written
findings of fact in support of the order.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 418.200 is amended to read:
418.200. As used in ORS 418.200 to 418.202, “foster child” means  a child who is in the legal or
physical custody of the Department of Human Services pursuant to the provisions of  ORS chapter
418, 419B or 419C and who is or  was placed or who is awaiting placement  in substitute care with
a foster parent, a child-caring agency as defined in ORS 418.205 or an  independent residence facility
established, licensed, certified or authorized by the department under ORS 418.475.
SECTION 3.  ORS 418.201 is amended to read:
418.201. It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that each foster child have certain  essential
rights, including but not limited to the following:
(1) To have the ability to make oral and written complaints about  care, placement or services
that are unsatisfactory or inappropriate, and to be provided  with information about a formal process
for making complaints without fear of retaliation, harassment or punishment.
(2) To be  notified of, and provided with transportation to, court hearings and reviews by local
citizen review boards pertaining to the foster child’s case . [ when the matters to be considered  or de-
cided upon at the hearings and reviews are appropriate for the foster child, taking  into account the age
and developmental stage of the foster child. ]
(3) To be provided with written contact information of specific  individuals whom the foster child
may contact regarding complaints, concerns or violations of rights, that is  updated as necessary and
kept current.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1533 (SB 1533-A) Page 1
(4) To be protected from abuse, exploitation, neglect, intimidation, retaliation  and
wrongful use of restraint or seclusion.
(5) To regularly attend school and to have access to a free and appropriate public edu-
cation.
(6) To be assigned an attorney to represent the  foster child’s interests and to have un-
impeded and unmonitored contact with that attorney.
(7) To  have unimpeded and unmonitored contact, as applicable, with the Residential Fa-
cilities Ombudsman, the Children’s  Advocate or a foster care ombudsman who has been
formally designated by the Children’s Advocate or the Department of Human Services.
(8) To have an attorney or court-appointed advocate of the foster child’s choosing present
for any interview with law enforcement or abuse investigators,  regardless of whether the
foster child is interviewed as a witness, a victim or a subject individual.
(9) To maintain and have access to personal belongings including  but not limited to
clothing, books, toys, photographs and musical instruments.
(10) To be present at court  hearings, including to be present at all court hearings re-
garding the child’s case.
(11) To transport belongings and personal effects in an appropriate luggage  carrier when
entering into or transitioning or exiting from foster care.
[(4)] (12) When a foster child is 14  years of age or older, to be provided with written information
within 60 days of the date of any placement or any change in placement, regarding:
(a) How to establish a bank account in the foster child’s name as allowed under state law;
(b) How to acquire a driver license as allowed under state law;
(c) How to remain in foster care after reaching 18 years of age;
(d) The availability  of a tuition and fee waiver for a current or former foster child under ORS
350.300;
(e) How to obtain a copy of the foster child’s credit report, if any;
(f) How to obtain medical, dental, vision, mental health services or other treatment,  including
services and treatments available without parental consent under state law; and
(g) A transition toolkit, including a comprehensive transition plan.
[(5)] (13) With respect to a foster  child’s rights under the federal and state constitutions, laws,
including case law, rules and regulations:
(a) To receive a document setting forth such rights that is  age-appropriate and developmentally
appropriate within [ 60] seven days of the date of any placement or any change in placement;
(b) To have a document setting forth such rights  that is age-appropriate and developmentally
appropriate posted at the residences of all foster parents, child-caring  agencies and independent
resident facilities;
(c) To  have an annual review of such rights that is age-appropriate and developmentally appro-
priate while the foster child is in substitute care; and
(d) When the foster child is 14 years of age or older:
(A) To receive a  document setting forth such rights that is age-appropriate and developmentally
appropriate;  and
(B) To acknowledge in writing receipt  of the document and that the rights contained in the
document were explained in an age-appropriate manner.
[(6)] (14)  To be provided with current and updated contact information for adults who are  re-
sponsible for the care of  the foster child and who are involved in the foster child’s case, including
but not limited to caseworkers, caseworker supervisors, attorneys, foster youth advocates and  sup-
porters, court appointed special  advocates, local citizen review boards and employees of the De-
partment of Human Services that provide certification of foster parents, child-caring agencies  and
independent resident facilities.
[(7)] (15) To have a hotline phone number that  is available to the foster child at all times for
the purposes of enabling the foster  child to make complaints and assert grievances regarding the
foster child’s care, safety or well-being.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1533 (SB 1533-A) Page 2
SECTION 4.  ORS 418.607 is amended to read:
418.607. It is  the intent of the Legislative Assembly that siblings who are foster children have
certain essential rights, including but not limited to the following:
(1) To obtain substitute care placements together whenever safe and appropriate.
(2) To maintain regular contact and visits with siblings while placed both in and out  of substi-
tute care placements, including regular in-person visits,  contact by telephone and electronic
communication[ , as safe and appropriate ], except as limited, denied or prohibited by  court order
under section 1 of this 2026 Act .
(3) To be provided with transportation to maintain contact and have visits with siblings.
(4) To be placed with foster parents and assigned caseworkers who have been provided with
training on the importance of sibling relationships.
(5) [ To ensure that contact with  siblings will be encouraged in any adoptive or guardianship
placement, as safe and appropriate. ] To ensure that contact with siblings will  be regularly
maintained, encouraged and facilitated in any adoptive or guardianship placement, except  as
limited, denied or prohibited by court order under section 1 of this 2026 Act.
(6) To have a sibling contact plan that  has been developed as a result of the active engagement
and participation of siblings and that is complied with as part of any substitute care placement.
(7) [ To have more private  or less restrictive communication with siblings as compared to commu-
nications with  others who are not siblings, as safe and appropriate. ] To have private and unre-
stricted communication with siblings except as limited, denied  or prohibited by court order
under section 1 of this 2026 Act.
(8) To be immediately and timely  notified of the birth of a sibling or  placement changes or
catastrophic events affecting a sibling, [ as safe and appropriate ] in a developmentally  appropriate
and trauma-responsive manner .
(9) With respect to a foster child’s rights under this section:
(a) To receive a document setting forth such rights as is age-appropriate and  developmentally
appropriate within [ 60] seven days of the date of any placement or any change in placement;
(b) To have a document setting  forth such rights that is age-appropriate and developmentally
appropriate on each occasion that a foster child’s case plan is considered and reviewed;
[(c) To have access to a document setting forth such rights that is  age-appropriate and develop-
mentally appropriate at the residence of all foster parents and child-caring agencies; and ]
(c) To have access to a document setting forth such rights that is developmentally  ap-
propriate and trauma responsive, and is prominently displayed at the  residence of all foster
parents and child-caring agencies in at least one location that children  in care can readily
access at all times; and
(d) To be informed of such rights on at least an annual basis.
[(10) To be provided with an explanation in an age-appropriate manner as to why contact with  a
sibling is or has been denied or prohibited. ]
(10) To be informed that the right  to have contact and visitation with siblings is pre-
sumed and may not be limited, denied or prohibited without written findings by the court
detailing why restrictions are necessary to ensure safe and appropriate contact.
(11) To  be informed verbally and in writing, in a developmentally appropriate and
trauma-responsive manner,  as to why a specific request for communication or visitation with
a sibling has been limited, denied or prohibited.
[(11)] (12) To have the rights under this section apply regardless  of whether the parental rights
of one or more of the foster child’s parents have been terminated, as safe and appropriate.
[(12)] (13) To request that the foster child’s attorney advocate on behalf of the foster  child for
contact and visits with siblings:
(a) While the foster child is in foster care;
(b) When the court  is considering whether to order visitation between the foster child and the
foster child’s siblings under ORS 419B.367; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1533 (SB 1533-A) Page 3
(c) When decisions are made regarding post-adoption contact  between the foster child and the
foster child’s siblings.
CHILDREN IN CARE
SECTION 5.  ORS 409.185 is amended to read:
409.185. (1) The Director of Human Services shall oversee the  development of standards and
procedures for assessment, investigation and enforcement of child protective services.
(2)(a) The Department of Human Services  shall take action to implement the provision of child
protective services as  outlined in ORS 417.705 to 417.800 and based on the recommendations in the
1992 “Oregon Child Protective Services  Performance Study” published by the University of Southern
Maine.
(b) In all substantiated cases of child abuse and neglect, the role of the department is  to com-
plete a comprehensive family assessment of risk  of abuse or neglect, or both, assess service needs
and provide immediate protective services as necessary.
(c) The department shall provide remedial services needed to ensure the safety of the child.
(d) In all cases of child abuse and neglect for which a criminal investigation is conducted, the
role of law enforcement agencies is to provide a legally sound,  child sensitive investigation of
whether abuse or neglect or both have occurred and  to gather other evidence and perform other
responsibilities in accordance with interagency agreements.
(e) The  department and law enforcement agencies shall conduct the investigation and assess-
ment concurrently, based upon the protocols and procedures of the county  child abuse multidisci-
plinary team in each jurisdiction.
(f) When the department and law enforcement agencies  conduct a joint investigation and as-
sessment, the  activities of the department and agencies are to be clearly differentiated by the pro-
tocols of the county child abuse multidisciplinary team.
(g) Nothing in this subsection is intended to be inconsistent with ORS 418.702,  418.747 and
418.748 and ORS chapter 419B.
(h) In all cases of child abuse  for which an investigation is conducted, the department shall
provide a child’s parent, guardian or  caregiver with a clear written explanation of the investigation
process, the court hearing process  and the rights of the parent, guardian or caregiver in the abuse
investigation and in  the court proceedings related to the abuse investigation.  When the depart-
ment provides the written  explanation under this paragraph to a child’s parent or guardian,
the department shall include a disclosure that the representative of the  department is acting
on behalf of the department and cannot provide legal advice to the parent or guardian.
(3) Upon receipt of a recommendation of  the Children’s Advocate under ORS 417.815 (2)(e), the
department shall implement the  recommendation or give the Children’s Advocate written notice of
an intent not to implement the recommendation.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 6.
The unit captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any  leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1533 (SB 1533-A) Page 4
Passed by Senate February 18, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 2, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1533 (SB 1533-A) Page 5